Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-12,176
Private dollars, defined.

(1) Private dollars means dollars invested in the project or donated to the applicant specifically for the project by any combination of one or more of the following:

(a) An individual;

(b) An organization that is exempt from income tax under section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code; or

(c) Any nongovernmental organization.

(2) Private dollars does not include any direct or indirect funding from any federal, state, or local government.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 92;

Laws 2025, LB264, § 181.